Washington statutes.
RCW 15.83.050

Violations of chapter—Complaint.

(1) If any person is charged with violating any provision of this chapter, the director shall investigate the charges. If, upon investigation, the director has reasonable cause to believe that the person charged has violated the provision, the director shall issue and cause to be served upon the person, a complaint stating the charges. A hearing on the charges shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW concerning contested cases.

(2) No complaint may be issued based upon any act occurring more than six months before the filing of the charge with the director. At the discretion of the director, any other person may be allowed to intervene in the proceeding and to present testimony and other evidence.

(3) If upon the preponderance of the evidence taken, the director is of the opinion that any person named in the complaint has engaged in or is engaging in any prohibited practice, the director shall make and enter findings of fact and shall issue and cause to be served on that person, an order requiring that person to cease and desist from the practice and to take affirmative action to further the policies of this chapter. The order may also require the person to make reports from time to time showing the extent of compliance with the order. If, upon the preponderance of the testimony and other evidence, the director determines that the person named in the complaint has not engaged in or is not engaging in any prohibited practice, the director shall make and enter findings of fact and an order dismissing the complaint.

[ 1989 c 355 s 6.]